South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3239.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 3, Title 34 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 34-3-105.  A bank or financial institution doing business in this State, whose charges or fees are not regulated solely by federal law may not charge a fee in excess of $1.50 for a cash transfer, deposit, or withdrawal conducted at automated teller machines. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect January 1, 2026. ----XX----